District of Columbia statutes.
8-231.13

Record keeping and disclosure requirements.

(a)

Owners, business entities, and individuals subject to this subchapter shall maintain copies of any records or reports required by this subchapter, for 6 years, or as the Mayor may otherwise establish by rule, and shall make those documents available for inspection by the Mayor upon request.

(b)

If the Mayor is denied access to any records, reports, documents, or other data requested in connection with ensuring compliance with this subchapter, the Mayor may issue a subpoena to obtain all necessary documents.

(c)

An owner shall maintain copies of all lead-related reports related to the building or any part thereof and make the reports available to tenants, tenants’ agents, and government officials for review and photocopying at reasonable hours and at a location reasonably close to the property.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 14, 56 DCR 1596
Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-348, § 2(j), 58 DCR 717
D.C. Law 18-348 added subsec. (c).